Wisconsin, session 2025, SB758.
do enact as follows:SB758,11Section 1. 134.07 of the statutes is created to read:SB758,2,32134.07 Social media platforms’ treatment of minors. (1) Definitions. 3In this section:SB758,2,54(a) “Minor” means an individual who is under 18 years of age and who resides 5in this state.SB758,2,76(b) “Social media platform” means a public or semipublic online website, 7service, or application that satisfies all of the following:SB758,2,881. The website, service, or application is used by a minor in this state.SB758,2,1092. The website, service, or application allows users to construct a public or 10semipublic profile for the purposes of using the website, service, or application.SB758,2,14113. The website, service, or application allows users to create or post content 12that is viewable by other users, including on message boards, in chat rooms, or 13through a landing page or main feed that presents the user with content generated 14by other users.SB758,3,214. The website, service, or application allows users to privately message each 2other as a significant part of the provision of the website, service, or application.SB758,3,113(c) “Targeted advertising” means displaying or presenting an online 4advertisement to a consumer or to a device identified by a unique persistent 5identifier or to a group of consumers or devices identified by unique persistent 6identifiers if the advertisement is selected based in whole or in part on known or 7predicted preferences, characteristics, behavior, or interests associated with the 8consumer or a device identified by a unique persistent identifier. “Targeted 9advertising” includes displaying or presenting the advertisement and marketing 10measurement related to such advertisements. “Targeted advertising” does not 11include first-party advertising or contextual advertising.SB758,3,2312(d) “Unique persistent identifier” means a technologically created identifier to 13the extent that such identifier is reasonably linkable to a consumer or a device that 14identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to one or more consumers, including 15device identifiers, Internet Protocol addresses, cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile 16advertisement identifiers or similar technology customer numbers, unique 17pseudonyms, user aliases, telephone numbers, or other forms of persistent or 18probabilistic identifiers that are linked or reasonably linkable to one or more 19consumers or devices. “Unique persistent identifier” does not include an identifier 20assigned by a controller for the sole purpose of giving effect to the exercise of 21affirmative consent or opt out by a consumer with respect to the collecting, 22processing, and transfer of personal data or otherwise limiting the collecting, 23processing, or transfer of personal data.SB758,4,324(2) Data privacy. Except as provided in sub. (4) and as necessary to comply 1with the requirements of this section, no social media platform may gather, use, 2sell, offer, or retain data relating to a minor’s use of or interaction with a social 3media platform.SB758,4,84(3) Data-based recommendation, selection, or prioritization. Except as 5provided in sub. (4), based on data gathered about the minor or from a device used 6by the minor to access the Internet, no social media platform may select, prioritize, 7or deprioritize for a minor, or recommend to a minor, information, content, or a 8feature of a social media platform.SB758,4,119(4) Exceptions. (a) Notwithstanding sub. (2), a social media platform may 10gather and retain the data necessary for a minor to establish and maintain the 11minor’s account on the social media platform.SB758,4,1312(b) Notwithstanding sub. (3), a social media platform may select or prioritize 13specific content for a minor if any of the following applies:SB758,4,15141. The minor has clearly and expressly requested the selection or 15prioritization of the specific content.SB758,4,17162. The specific content is provided to the minor via direct message from 17another user on the social media platform.SB758,4,20183. The specific content is the next piece of content in a preexisting sequence of 19content from the same user of the social media platform as the immediately 20preceding content viewed by the minor.SB758,4,2421(c) Notwithstanding sub. (3), a social media platform may deprioritize or block 22certain content for a minor when reasonably based on privacy or accessibility 23settings selected by the minor or if the minor has clearly and expressly requested 24the certain content to be deprioritized or blocked.SB758,5,41(d) Notwithstanding sub. (3), a social media platform may select, prioritize, 2deprioritize, or recommend specific information, content, or a feature of a social 3media platform in response to a specific search conducted by the minor on the social 4media platform.SB758,5,75(5) Age verification. A social media platform shall employ a reliable, 6industry-accepted method approved by the department of justice that determines 7whether a user of the social media platform is a minor.SB758,5,98(6) Targeted advertising to minors. A social media platform shall prevent 9targeted advertising from being shown to a minor user of the social media platform.SB758,5,1310(7) Enforcement and penalties. (a) The department of justice shall create 11and maintain a website to receive complaints, information, or referrals from the 12public regarding a social media platform’s alleged compliance or noncompliance 13with this section.SB758,5,1514(b) The department of justice may investigate violations of this section and 15may bring an action in the name of the state seeking injunctive relief. SB758,5,1816(c) The department of justice may bring an action in the name of the state to 17recover a civil forfeiture of not more than $5,000 per violation of this section, court 18costs, and notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1), reasonable attorney fees.SB758,5,2319(d) A person affected by a violation of this section, or a person on behalf of a 20person affected by a violation of this section, may bring a civil action to recover the 21person’s actual damages, an award of punitive damages not to exceed $5,000, court 22costs, and notwithstanding the limitations under s. 814.04 (1), reasonable attorney 23fees.SB758,6,424(e) In addition to the relief stated under pars. (b) to (d), a court may order any 1other relief or course of action the court deems reasonable, including an order for 2the disgorgement of any money that a violator received in the course of violating 3this section and an order that the person who violated this section pay the disgorged 4money to any injured individuals. SB758,25Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.SB758,6,66(1) Legislative findings. The legislature finds all of the following:SB758,6,77(a) Social media is a widely used tool for community and communication.SB758,6,118(b) Some social media platforms have evolved to include addictive features, 9including the algorithmic delivery of content and other design features, that pose a 10significant risk of harm to the mental health and well-being of children and 11adolescents.SB758,6,1712(c) The U.S. surgeon general has found evidence that identifies reasons for 13concern about social media usage by children and adolescents, including a study 14concluding that the risk of poor mental health outcomes doubles for children and 15adolescents who use social media at least 3 hours a day and research finding that 16social media usage is linked to a variety of negative health outcomes, including low 17self-esteem and disordered eating in adolescent girls.SB758,6,1918(d) Heavy usage of social media leads to less healthy sleep patterns and sleep 19quality, which can in turn exacerbate both physical and mental health problems.SB758,6,2320(e) Social media usage is associated with more negative mental health 21outcomes, including depressive symptoms and self-harm behaviors, than is 22associated with consumption of other forms of media such as television or video 23games.SB758,7,324(f) Targeted advertisements on social media can expose children and 1adolescents to harmful content, including alcohol, pharmaceuticals, and extreme 2weight loss, and amplify their preexisting vulnerabilities to anxiety, depression, 3and eating disorders.SB758,7,64(g) Both this state and the country as a whole are facing an ongoing youth 5mental health crisis, with rates of adolescent suicides, depressive episodes, and 6feelings of sadness and hopelessness on the rise in recent years.SB758,7,97(h) For these reasons, it is essential that this state act to ensure that social 8media platforms prohibit addictive social media features and targeted advertising 9for children and adolescents.SB758,310Section 3. Effective date.SB758,7,1211(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 12publication.SB758,7,1313